Hawaii statutes.
§342L-5 Variances allowed. Provisions
under this chapter deemed more stringent than the federal rules established
under Subtitle I of the federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, as
added by the federal Hazardous and Solid Waste Amendments of 1984, may be
varied by the department, when the variance results in an equivalent degree of
human health and environmental protection and does not present a greater danger
to human health or the environment. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §6; am L 1992, c 259,
§6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next